Utah statutes.
39-1-29.   Organization of National Guard controlled by federal law.

The organization of the National Guard, including the composition of all units thereof, shall be such as is or may hereafter be prescribed for this state by federal law. The location of units including headquarters shall, when not otherwise prescribed by federal law, be fixed by the governor on the recommendation of the adjutant general.

